test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-PROG-yii-tsidiitla_run-away.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - tsídiitł'á[run-away] :
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Prog+SbjSg1:       tsídíyistł'áł
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Prog+SbjSg2:       tsídíyíítł'áł
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Prog+SbjSg3:       tsídáátł'áł
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Prog+SbjPl1:       [tsídíyiìtł'áł, tsídíyaàtł'áł]
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Prog+SbjPl1+Distr: [dàtsídíyiìtł'áł, dàtsídíyaàtł'áł]
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Prog+SbjPl2:       tsídíyastł'áł
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Prog+SbjPl2+Distr: dàtsídíyastł'áł
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Prog+SbjPl3:       tsígídáátł'áł
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Prog+SbjPl3+Distr: dàtsígídáátł'áł
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Prog+SbjSg4:       tsíts'ídáátł'áł
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Prog+SbjSg4+Distr: dàtsíts'ídáátł'áł
